North Carolina statutes. Chapter 57D. North Carolina Limited Liability Company Act.
Part 1. Certificate of Authority.

§ 57D-7-01.
Authority to transact business.

A foreign LLC may not transact business in this State until it obtains a certificate of authority from the Secretary of State.

Without excluding other activities that may not constitute transacting business in this State, a foreign LLC is not considered to be transacting business in this State for the purposes of this Chapter by reason of conducting in this State any one or more of the following activities:

Maintaining or defending any proceeding or effecting the settlement thereof or the settlement of claims or disputes.

Holding meetings of its members, managers, or other company officials or carrying on other activities concerning its internal affairs.

Maintaining bank accounts or borrowing money in this State, with or without providing security for repayment or other performance and without regard to the frequency of such transactions.

Maintaining offices or agencies for the exchange or other transfer and registration of all or any class or portion of its membership or other equity or beneficial ownership interests or securities, or appointing and maintaining trustees or depositories with relation to its membership or other equity or beneficial ownership interests or securities.

Soliciting or procuring orders, whether by mail or through employees or agents or otherwise, where the orders require acceptance to be made outside of the territory of this State to become binding contracts.

Making or investing in loans with or without security, including servicing of mortgages or deeds of trust through independent agencies within the territory of this State, conducting foreclosure proceedings and selling or acquiring property in foreclosure sales, and managing or renting property acquired in foreclosure sales in connection with and in furtherance of efforts to sell and otherwise liquidate such property, provided no office or agency of the foreign LLC is maintained in this State.

Taking security for or collecting debts due the foreign LLC or enforcing any rights the foreign LLC may have in property subject to or otherwise providing security with respect to the repayment or other performance of the debt obligations.

Transacting business in interstate commerce.

Conducting an isolated transaction completed within a period of six months but not repeated transactions of a similar nature.

Selling property or services through independent contractors.

Owning real or personal property.

History.

2013-157, s. 2.

§ 57D-7-02.
Consequences of transacting business without authority.

No foreign LLC transacting business in this State without permission obtained through a certificate of authority may maintain any proceeding in any court of this State unless the foreign LLC has obtained a certificate of authority prior to trial. An issue arising under this subsection must be raised by motion and determined by the trial judge prior to trial.

A foreign LLC failing to obtain a certificate of authority as required by this Chapter is liable to this State for the years, including any partial year, during which it transacted business in this State without a certificate of authority in an amount equal to all fees and taxes that would have been imposed by law on the foreign LLC had it duly applied for and received such permission, plus interest and all penalties imposed by law for failure to pay such fees and taxes. In addition, the foreign LLC is liable for a civil penalty of ten dollars ($10.00) for each day, but not to exceed a total of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each year, including any partial year it transacts business in this State without a certificate of authority. The Attorney General may bring actions to recover all amounts due this State under the provisions of this subsection. The clear proceeds of civil penalties provided for in this subsection shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the failure of a foreign LLC to obtain a certificate of authority does not impair the validity of its acts or prevent it from defending any proceeding in this State.

The Secretary of State shall require every foreign LLC transacting business in this State to comply with the provisions of this Chapter. The Secretary of State may conduct such investigations as may be necessary to ascertain compliance by foreign LLCs with this Chapter.

History.

2013-157, s. 2.

§ 57D-7-03.
Application for certificate of authority.

A foreign LLC may apply for a certificate of authority to transact business in this State by delivering an application to the Secretary of State for filing. The application must provide the following information:

The name of the foreign LLC and, if different, a name that satisfies the requirements of Article 3 of Chapter 55D of the General Statutes.

The name of the jurisdiction under whose law it is organized.

The street address, and the mailing address if different from the street address, of its principal office, if any, and the county in which the principal office, if any, is located.

The street address, and the mailing address if different from the street address, of its registered office in this State and the name of its registered agent at that office.

The names, titles, and business addresses of the foreign LLC’s principal company officials.

A foreign LLC shall deliver with the completed application for the certificate of authority a certificate of existence or a document of similar import duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of limited liability company records in the jurisdiction under whose law it is organized.

If the Secretary of State finds that the application conforms to law, the Secretary of State when all taxes, fees, and other payments have been tendered as prescribed in this Chapter, shall do the following:

File the application and the certificate of existence or a document of similar import as described in subsection (b) of this section, as provided in

G.S. 55D-15

.

Issue a certificate of authority to transact business in this State to which the Secretary of State shall affix the exact or conformed copy of the application.

Send to the foreign LLC or its representative the certificate of authority, together with the exact or conformed copy of the application affixed thereto.

History.

2013-157, s. 2.

§ 57D-7-04.
Amended certificate of authority.

A foreign LLC authorized to transact business in this State shall obtain an amended certificate of authority from the Secretary of State if it changes either of the following:

Its name.

The jurisdiction of its organization.

A foreign LLC may apply for an amended certificate of authority by delivering an application to the Secretary of State for filing that sets forth the following:

The name of the foreign LLC and if different the name provided in the foreign LLC’s certificate of authority that the foreign LLC is authorized to use to transact business in this State.

The name of the jurisdiction under whose law it is organized.

The date it was originally authorized to transact business in this State.

A statement of the change or changes being made.

Except for the content of the application, the requirements of

G.S. 57D-7-03

for obtaining an original certificate of authority apply to obtaining an amended certificate under this section.

History.

2013-157, s. 2.

§ 57D-7-05.
Effect of certificate of authority.

A certificate of authority authorizes the foreign LLC to which it is issued to transact business in this State subject to the right of the State to revoke the certificate as provided in this Chapter. A foreign LLC may qualify in this State as executor, administrator, or guardian, or as trustee under the will of any person domiciled in this State at the time of that person’s death only in accordance with applicable provisions of Article 24 of Chapter 53 of the General Statutes.

A foreign LLC qualifying as testamentary trustee or executor under the provisions of this section shall appoint a process agent and file such appointment with the court as required by G.S. 28A-4-2(4).

Except as otherwise provided by this Chapter, a foreign LLC with a valid certificate of authority has the same but no greater rights and has the same but no greater privileges as, and is subject to the same duties, restrictions, penalties, and liabilities now or later imposed on, an LLC of like character.

History.

2013-157, s. 2.

§ 57D-7-06.
Registered office and registered agent of foreign LLC.

Each foreign LLC authorized to transact business in this State must maintain a registered office and registered agent as required by Article 4 of Chapter 55D of the General Statutes and is subject to service on the Secretary of State under that Article.

History.

2013-157, s. 2.

§§ 57D-7-07 through 57D-7-19.

Reserved for future codification purposes.